Idaho statutes. Title 22 AGRICULTURE AND HORTICULTURE
Chapter 6 COMMERCIAL FERTILIZERS
§ 22-625. Statements of uniform interpretation and policy.

When not otherwise stated in this chapter or rule adopted under this chapter, the statements of uniform interpretation and policy as adopted in the annual Official Publication of the Association of American Plant Food Control Officials (AAPFCO) shall guide the department when making decisions in the areas covered by AAPFCO statements of uniform interpretation and policy.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-625, as added by 2001, ch. 147, § 9, p. 516.

§ 22-626. Local legislation — Prohibition.

No local government entity including, but not limited to, any city, county, township, or municipal corporation or any other body corporate and politic that is responsible for government activities in a geographic area smaller than that of the state of Idaho, shall:

Regulate the registration, packaging, labeling, sale, storage, distribution, use and application of fertilizers;

Adopt or continue in effect local legislation relating to the registration, packaging, labeling, sale, storage, distribution, use or application of fertilizers.

Ordinances adopted by the local government entity in violation of this section are void and unenforceable.

The provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not preempt county or city local zoning ordinances governing the physical location or siting of fertilizer manufacturing, storage and sales facilities or protecting the quality of ground water or surface water in accordance with applicable state and federal law.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-626, as added by 2005, ch. 387, § 1, p. 1248.